Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4307
Marl, defined.

Marl shall mean a granular or loosely consolidated earthy material composed largely of seashell fragments and calcium carbonate.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 7.